Illinois, session 104th, HB3700.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Community Violence Intervention Workforce Development Act. 6    Section 5. Intent.7    (a) Community violence intervention services provide 8comprehensive outreach, mental health, and employment training 9and placement services to individuals at highest risk of being 10shot or shooting someone in communities with high 11concentrations of gunshot victims.12    (b) Initial data and evaluation indicates comprehensive 13community violence intervention services show promise in 14contributing to the reduction in gun violence victims in 15Illinois. 16    (c) Community violence intervention services require a 17variety of skilled professionals with lived experience and 18cultural competency to maximize the effectiveness of outreach, 19mental health, and employment and training services.20    (d) The need for those with lived experience and cultural 21competency to be the primary workforce for community violence 22intervention restricts the available workforce for community 23violence intervention professionals.  HB3700- 2 -LRB104 08640 RLC 18693 b1    (e) Individuals with lived experience in chronic exposure 2to gun violence frequently require specialized supports to 3professionalize their approach and maintain their traumatic 4recovery from exposure to gun violence while working in the 5gun violence prevention field.6    (f) Illinois has a shortage of qualified community 7violence intervention professionals at all job functions while 8less than 20% of those with chronic exposure to gun violence 9are currently being served with community violence 10intervention services. 11    Section 10. Community Violence Intervention Workforce 12Development Workgroup; duties. The Office of Firearm Violence 13Prevention within the Department of Human Services shall 14establish the Community Violence Intervention Workforce 15Development Workgroup. The Office of Firearm Violence 16Prevention shall convene a group of experts in the field of 17community violence intervention and conduct meetings and 18analysis as the Community Violence Intervention Workforce 19Development Workgroup. The Community Violence Intervention 20Workforce Development Workgroup shall complete the following 21tasks before December 31, 2026.22        (1) estimate the number of highest risk individuals 23    currently being served with community violence 24    intervention services and the number of high risk 25    individuals that likely need these services;  HB3700- 3 -LRB104 08640 RLC 18693 b1        (2) determine the current and future workforce needs 2    of the community violence intervention field in Illinois 3    based on a goal of serving 75% of those with chronic 4    exposure to gun violence in the next 5 years;5        (3) identify the critical job function and categories 6    required by community violence intervention services;7        (4) develop estimates of the available workforce by 8    job function and category to its best ability;9        (5) develop job descriptions and merit assessment 10    tools by job function and category;11        (6) identify changes to grant and other State funding 12    that can enable stronger recruitment, training, and 13    evaluation of community violence intervention workers and 14    services; and15        (7) make recommendations to the General Assembly by 16    job function and category for changes to State law that 17    will allow for the development and implementation of 18    career paths and quality recruitment and retention of a 19    community violence intervention workforce.  20    Section 15. Community Violence Intervention Workforce 21Development Workgroup; membership. 22    (a) The Community Violence Intervention Workforce 23Development Workgroup shall be comprised of the following 24members:25        (1) one representative from Metropolitan Peace   HB3700- 4 -LRB104 08640 RLC 18693 b1    Academy;2        (2) one representative from READI Chicago;3        (3) one representative from a Chicago-based violence 4    prevention organization that is not part of the 5    Communities partnering for Peace or READI Chicago 6    networks;7        (4) one representative from Community Based Violence 8    Prevention Agency-Peoria;9        (5) one representative from Community Based Violence 10    Prevention Agency-East St. Louis;11        (6) one representative from Community Based Violence 12    Prevention Agency-Rockford;13        (7) one representative from Community Based Violence 14    Prevention Agency-Aurora/Elgin;15        (8) one representative from an organization that 16    operates community violence intervention services itself 17    and funds the development of other network services with 18    private funds;19        (9) one representative from the Illinois Criminal 20    Justice Information Authority;21        (10) one representative from a university-based 22    research institution that evaluates violence prevention 23    programs;24        (11) one representative from the Office of Firearm 25    Violence Prevention;26        (12) a representative from the behavioral health   HB3700- 5 -LRB104 08640 RLC 18693 b1    community; 2        (13) one representative from the foundation community 3    that both funds violence intervention services itself and 4    participates in a private funding collaborative that funds 5    violence prevention services;6        (14) a representative of a community college; 7        (15) a representative of the City of Chicago; and 8        (16) 4 members of the General Assembly, one each 9    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, 10    the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, the 11    President of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the 12    Senate.13    (b) The members of the Workgroup listed in paragraphs (1) 14through (15) of subsection (a) shall be appointed by the 15Assistant Secretary of Firearm Violence Prevention, or the 16Assistant Secretary's designee.17    (c) The Assistant Secretary of Firearm Violence 18Prevention, or his or her designee, shall convene the 19Community Violence Intervention Workforce Development 20Workgroup, and work in collaboration with members to submit a 21final report to the General Assembly.  22    Section 20. Dissolution. The Workgroup is dissolved on 23January 1, 2027. 24    Section 25. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1,   HB3700- 6 -LRB104 08640 RLC 18693 b12027. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.